2025 (C_Program Files_Freedom Scientific_JAWS)/Liblouis/3.34.0/tables/nemeth.ctb
# liblouis: Nemeth Table for mathematics
#
#  Based on the Linux screenreader BRLTTY, copyright (C) 1999-2006 by
#  The BRLTTY Team
#
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2008 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2006 JJB Software, Inc. www.jjb-software.com
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

include en-chardefs.cti All character definition opcodes
include nemethdefs.cti

# Braille indicators
multind 56-6 letsign capsletter
capsletter 6
emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold
begemph italic 46
endemph italic 46-46
begemph bold 456
endemph bold 456-456
begcomp 456-346
endcomp 456-156

# Letters are defined in en-chardefs
# punctuation

prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
prepunc ' 6-236
postpunc ' 356-3
postpunc , 6
always , 6-a
always # 35-2345 print number sign before number
decpoint . 46
hyphen - 36
postpunc . 456-256
endnum . 456-256
always . 256
postpunc ; 456-23
postpunc : 456-25
always ! 12346 factorial
always < a-5-13-a
always = a-46-13-a
always > a-46-2-a
postpunc ? 456-236
endnum % 4-356
always ~~ 4-156-5-4-156
always \x2248 a-4-156-4-156-a almost equals
always ~ 4-156
always & 456-12346
midnum * 4-16
always [ 4-12356
always ] 4-23456
always { 46-12356
always } 46-23456
always @ 4-1
always \\ 456-16
always | 1256
always $ 4-234
always \x27E8 46-46-12356 left angle bracket
always \x27E9 46-46-23456 right angle bracket
always \x2015 156 horizontal bar above accented centered
repeated \s 0
noback context ["\x25A1"]$d @1246-256-5
noback context ["\x25A0"]$d @1246-456-256-5
always \x00b0 45-46-16
always \x00B1 346-36

# semantic character pairs
math \xf400 0
math \xf401 0
math \xf402 0
math \xf403 0
# Begin and end equation
# replace \xf32e
# replace \xf32f
grouping math \xf32e\xf32f 12e,15e
# Sub and superscript
math \xf320 56
replace \xf401\xf320
always \xf402\xf320 5
math \xf321 45
replace \xf401\xf321
always \xf402\xf321 5
# Underscript and overscript
math \xf322 146
always \xf401\xf322 5
always \xf402\xf322 12456
math \xf323 126
always \xf401\xf323 5
always \xf402\xf323 12456
# Fenced characters
always \xf401( 12356
always \xf402) 23456
always \xf401{ 246
always \xf402} 12456
# Expression groups
replace \xf326
replace \xf327
# Fractions
math \xf500 1456
math \xf501 34
math \xf502 456-34
math \xf503 3456
# Mixed Fractions
math \xf504 456-1456
math \xf505 34
math \xf506 456-34
math \xf507 456-3456
# Complex Fractions
math \xf508 6-1456
math \xf509 6-34
math \xf50a 6-456-34
math \xf50b 6-3456
# Roots
math \xf32a 345
always \xf403\xf32a 345
math \xf32b 12456
math \xf32c 126
# Matrices
replace \xf330
replace \xf331
math \xf332 4-6-12356
math \xf333 4-6-23456
replace \xf334
replace \xf335
# Protect against wrong use of prefixes
replace \xf400
replace \xf401
replace \xf402
replace \xf403

# Old LibLouisUTDML semantic character pairs
always ^, 6
always ^; 56
always ^: 156
always ^. 46
always ^! 2346
always ^" 5
always ^' 3
always ^( 12356
always ^) 23456
always ^- 36
always ^_ 456
always ^< 126
always ^= 123456
always ^> 345
always ^% 146
always ^+ 346
always ^~ 45
always ^` 4
always ^& 12346
always ^$ 1246
always ^? 1456
always ^{ 246
always ^} 12456
always ^# 3456
always ^| 1256
always ^/ 34
always ^* 16
repeated ^1 a
# Functions commented out for JAWS per MathServer-side fix in BZ121179
# Function names and abbreviations
# always acos 1-14-135-234-a
# always antilog 1-1345-2345-24-123-135-1245-a
# always arc 1-1235-14-a
# always arccos 1-1235-14-14-135-234-a
# always arg 1-1235-1245-a
# always asin 1-234-24-1345-a
# always atan 1-2345-1-1345-a
# always colog 14-123-135-1245-a
# always cos 14-135-234-a
# always cosh 14-135-234-125-a
# always cot 14-135-2345-a
# always coth 14-135-2345-125-a
# always covers 14-135-1236-15-1235-234-a
# always csc 14-234-14-a
# always csch 14-234-14-125-a
# always erf 15-1235-124-a
# always inf 24-1345-124-a
# always ln 123-1345-a
# always log 123-135-1245-a
# always max 134-1-1346-a
# always min 134-24-1345-a
# always sec 234-15-14-a
# always sech 234-15-14-125-a
# always sin 234-24-1345-a
# always sinh 234-24-1345-125-a
# always tan 2345-1-1345-a
# always tanh 2345-1-135-125-a
# always vers 1236-15-1235-234-a
# End of commented out functions for JAWS mathserver-side fix BZ12179
# computer braille character sequences
compbrl :// URLs
compbrl www.
compbrl .com
compbrl .edu
compbrl .gov
compbrl .mil
compbrl .net
compbrl .org
compbrl .doc
compbrl .htm
compbrl .html
compbrl .tex
compbrl .txt
compbrl .gif
compbrl .jpg
compbrl .png
compbrl .wav
compbrl .tar
compbrl .zip

# pass 2 corrections

# get rid of base-line ind. after subscripts
noback pass2 @56[$d1-5]@5!$d *
# insert another superscript ind. on doube superscripts
noback pass2 @45[]$d@5-5 @45
#get rid of extra baseline inds.
noback pass2 @5-5 @5 
noback pass2 @5-0 @0 
noback pass2 @5-a @a 
noback pass2 @5-1b-15 @1b-15
# get rid rid of superscript ind. on prime sign
noback pass2 @45-3-5 @3
# Put 456 in mixed numbers
noback pass2 $d[]@1456 @456
noback pass2 @456-1456!$s3-8[]@3456 @456
# Put number sign on numbers after spaces
noback pass2 @a[]$d @3456
noback pass2 [@a-0]$d @a-3456
noback pass2 @a-36[]$d @3456
noback pass2 [@a-0-36]$d @a-36-3456
noback pass2 @0[]$d @3456
noback pass2 @0-36[]$d @3456
noback pass2 @a-0 @a
noback pass2 @0-a @a
# fix anomaly with superscripts
noback pass2 @45-0-5 @45
noback pass2 @45-5 @45
# Fix single letter and digit with overbar
noback pass2 @5$l[@126-12456] @156
noback pass2 @5-6$l[@126-12456] @156
noback pass2 [@5]!$s@156 @a
noback pass2 @46-a @456-256
# get rid of space for overscripts 
noback pass2 @126-a @126
noback pass2 @146-a @146
noback pass2 @0-146 @146
noback pass2 @a-146 @146
noback pass2 @a-12456 @12456
# fix complex fraction begin and end (not perfectly)
noback pass2 @1456-1456 @6-1456-1456
noback pass2 @3456-3456 @3456-6-3456
# Fix lim with overbar sign
noback pass2 @5-123-24-134-126-12456 @126-123-24-134
# Get rid of open paren before matrices
noback pass2 @12356-4-6-12356 @4-6-12356
noback pass2 @1256-4-6-12356 @4-6-12356
# take off baseline ind. comma space
noback pass2 [@5-6]!$l @6
noback pass2 @1b-12[]$d @3456 number sign before digit at beginning
noback pass2 @1b-12-36[]$d @3456 number sign before minus before digit at beginning
noback pass2 [@12e]$d @3456
noback pass2 [@12e-36]$d @36-3456
noback pass2 [@12e-46]$d @3456-46
noback pass2 @12e ?
noback pass2 @15e ?
